Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1818
Authority; purpose.

The purpose of the authority shall be to assist private institutions of elementary and secondary education in the constructing, financing, and refinancing of projects.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 18.